Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions.
§ 4.1-126.
Repealed by Acts 2019, cc. 37 and 178, cl. 4, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor’s note.

Former §

4.1-126

, pertaining to licenses for establishments in national forests, certain adjoining lands, on the Blue Ridge Parkway, and certain other properties, derived from 1972, c. 304, § 4-98.12:2; 1976, c. 169; 1988, c. 63; 1992, c. 876; 1993, cc. 866, 954; 2001, cc. 461, 845; 2005, cc. 646, 689; 2006, c. 752; 2007, cc. 469, 813; 2013, cc. 35, 186, 558, 601, 633; 2014, c. 692; 2015, c. 348; 2016, c. 659; 2017, cc. 589, 595; 2018, c. 494; 2019, c. 175.

Acts 2019, cc. 37 and 178, cl. 3 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-124

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, mixed beverage licenses may be granted to any establishment described in §

4.1-126

of the Code of Virginia, as it was in effect prior to the effective date of this act, subject to all other applicable provisions of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and regulations of the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority.”

Acts 2019, cc. 37 and 178, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and third enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

§ 4.1-127.
Contests of local option referenda.

The regularity or legality of any referendum held pursuant to §§

4.1-121

,

4.1-123

and

4.1-124

shall be subject to the inquiry, determination, and judgment of the circuit court which ordered the referendum.
The court shall proceed upon complaint of fifteen or more qualified voters of the county, city, or town, filed within thirty days after the date the results of the referendum are certified and setting out fully the grounds of contest.
The complaint and the proceedings shall conform as nearly as practicable to the provisions of §

15.2-1654

, and the judgment of the court entered of record shall be a final determination of the regularity and legality of the referendum.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-47; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-128.
Local ordinances or resolutions regulating or taxing alcoholic beverages.

No county, city, or town shall, except as provided in §

4.1-205

or

4.1-129

, adopt any ordinance or resolution which regulates or prohibits the manufacture, bottling, possession, sale, wholesale distribution, handling, transportation, drinking, use, advertising or dispensing of alcoholic beverages in the Commonwealth. Nor shall any county, city, or town adopt an ordinance or resolution that prohibits or regulates the storage, warehousing, and wholesaling of wine in accordance with Title 4.1, regulations of the Board, and federal law at a licensed farm winery.No provision of law, general or special, shall be construed to authorize any county, city or town to adopt any ordinance or resolution that imposes a sales or excise tax on alcoholic beverages, other than the taxes authorized by §

58.1-605

,

58.1-3833

or

58.1-3840

. The foregoing limitation shall not affect the authority of any county, city or town to impose a license or privilege tax or fee on a business engaged in whole or in part in the sale of alcoholic beverages if the license or privilege tax or fee (i) is based on an annual or per event flat fee specifically authorized by general law or (ii) is an annual license or privilege tax specifically authorized by general law, which includes alcoholic beverages in its taxable measure and treats alcoholic beverages the same as if they were nonalcoholic beverages.

However, the governing body of any county, city, or town may adopt an ordinance that (i) prohibits the acts described in subsection A of §

4.1-308

subject to the provisions of subsections B and E of §

4.1-308

, or the acts described in §

4.1-309

, and may provide a penalty for violation thereof and (ii) subject to subsection C of § 4.1-308, regulates or prohibits the possession of opened alcoholic beverage containers in its local public parks, playgrounds, public streets, and any sidewalk adjoining any public street.

Except as provided in this section, all local acts, including charter provisions and ordinances of cities and towns, inconsistent with any of the provisions of this subtitle, are repealed to the extent of such inconsistency.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-98; 1983, c. 340; 1993, c. 866; 2000, cc. 381, 450; 2007, cc. 140, 454; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2017, cc. 157, 492.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 381 and 450 are virtually identical, and added the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 140 inserted “wholesale” in the first sentence, and inserted the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2007 amendment by c. 454 substituted “public streets, and any sidewalk adjoining any public street” for “and public streets” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and deleted “Alcoholic Beverage Control” preceding “Board” in the first paragraph and substituted “§ ” for “§§ ” preceding “58.1-605” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 157 and 492 are identical, and substituted “subsections B and E” for “subsection B” in clause (i) of subsection B, and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article, “Wine Tasting Activities in Virginia: Is America’s First Wine Producing State Destined to Wither on the Vine Due to Overregulation?,” see 23 T.M. Cooley L. Rev. 221 (2006).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Land Use and Zoning Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 63; 21 M.J. Zoning and Planning, § 5.

§ 4.1-129.
Local ordinances regulating time of sale of wine and beer.

The governing body of each county may adopt ordinances effective in that portion of such county not embraced within the corporate limits of any incorporated town, and the governing body of each city and town may adopt ordinances effective in such city or town, prohibiting the sale of wine or beer, or both, between the hours of twelve o’clock p.m. on each Saturday and six o’clock a.m. on each Monday, or fixing hours within such period during which wine or beer, or both, may be sold.
Such governing bodies shall provide for fines and other penalties for violations of any such ordinances which shall be enforced as if the violations were Class 1 misdemeanors, with a right of appeal pursuant to § 16.1-106.
Such ordinances shall not affect the sale of wine and beer on common carriers of passengers by train, boat, or airplane.

A copy of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall be certified by the clerk of the governing body adopting it and transmitted to the Board.

On and after the effective date of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section, no retail licensee authorized to sell wine or beer, or both, shall sell or permit the drinking of wine or beer on the premises of such licensee during the hours limited by the ordinance.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-97; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-130.
Importation of beverages not under customs or internal revenue bonds; storage in approved warehouses; release.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-311

, alcoholic beverages not under United States customs bonds or internal revenue bonds may be transported into and stored in the Commonwealth in warehouses which have been approved by the Board for that purpose.

The Board may refuse to approve any warehouse as a place where alcoholic beverages may be stored if it has reasonable cause to believe that the owner or operator of the warehouse is a person to whom or the place sought to be approved is one for which the Board may refuse to grant a license under the provisions of §

4.1-222

, which shall apply mutatis mutandis, unless the provisions of such section are inapplicable.

The Board may disapprove any warehouse which has been approved as a place where alcoholic beverages may be stored if it has reasonable cause to believe that a ground exists for which the Board may suspend or revoke a license under the provisions of §

4.1-225

, which shall apply mutatis mutandis, unless the provisions of such section are inapplicable.

Alcoholic beverages stored in warehouses in the Commonwealth pursuant to this section shall be released only on permits issued by the Board for delivery to the Board or to persons entitled to receive them within or outside the Commonwealth.

History.

1962, c. 200, § 4-84.1; 1993, c. 866; 2022, c. 201.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 201, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on such regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 201 substituted “§

4.1-311

” for “§

4.1-310

” in subsection A in the first paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 41.

§ 4.1-131.
Importation of beverages under customs bonds and holding in warehouses; release.

Alcoholic beverages may be imported into the Commonwealth under United States customs bonds and be held in the Commonwealth in United States customs bonded warehouses. Alcoholic beverages may be removed from any such warehouse, wherever situated, to such a warehouse located in the Commonwealth and be held in the Commonwealth.

Alcoholic beverages so imported or removed to such warehouses in the Commonwealth shall be released from customs bonds in the Commonwealth only (i) for delivery to the Board, or to licensees entitled to receive them in the Commonwealth, as provided in §

4.1-311

; (ii) to boats engaged in foreign trade, trade between the Atlantic and Pacific ports of the United States, trade between the United States and any of its possessions outside of the several states and the District of Columbia, or for shipment outside of the Commonwealth; or (iii) in accordance with subsection C for the official or personal use of persons who are on duty in the United States as members of the armed forces of any foreign country, or their immediate family, authorized by federal laws and regulations to receive imported alcoholic beverages free of customs duties and internal revenue taxes.

Persons operating United States customs bonded warehouses and licensed as wholesalers or retailers may make sales and deliveries, in quantities determined by the Board, of alcoholic beverages held in customs bond to foreign armed forces personnel as provided in subsection B. Such sales may be made only on permits issued by the Board which shall cover the transportation of such imported alcoholic beverages, either by the operator of a customs bonded warehouse or purchaser from the operator, from such customs bonded warehouse to the place of duty or residence of such authorized persons.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-85; 1958, c. 394; 1960, c. 101; 1984, c. 128; 1993, c. 866; 2022, c. 201.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 201, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The Board's initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on such regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 201 substituted “§

4.1-311

” for “§

4.1-310

” in subsection B in clause (i).

§ 4.1-132.
Transportation into or within Commonwealth under internal revenue bond and holding in warehouses; release.

Alcoholic beverages may be transported into the Commonwealth under United States internal revenue bonds and be held in the Commonwealth in United States internal revenue bonded warehouses. Alcoholic beverages may be removed from any such warehouse, wherever situated, to such a warehouse located in the Commonwealth and be held in the Commonwealth.

Alcoholic beverages may be transported within the Commonwealth under United States internal revenue bonds and be held in United States internal revenue bonded warehouses. Alcoholic beverages may be removed from any such warehouse and transported to a winery or farm winery licensee in accordance with §

4.1-206.1

.

Alcoholic beverages so transported or removed to such warehouses in the Commonwealth shall be released from internal revenue bonds in the Commonwealth only on permits issued by the Board for delivery to (i) boats engaged in foreign trade, trade between the Atlantic and Pacific ports of the United States, or trade between the United States and any of its possessions outside of the several states and the District of Columbia; (ii) installations of the United States Department of Defense; or (iii) holders of permits issued in accordance with subdivision A 13 of §

4.1-212

.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-86; 1954, c. 21; 1993, c. 866; 2003, c. 564; 2006, c. 826; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 564 inserted present subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C; and in subsection C, deleted “or” preceding “(ii),” and inserted “or (iii) holders of permits issued in accordance with subdivision 14 of §

4.1-212

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection B, substituted “§

4.1-206.1

” for “§

4.1-207

” in the second sentence at the end; and in subsection C, substituted “subdivision A 13” for “subdivision A 14.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 826 inserted “A” following “subdivision” in clause (iii) of subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection B, substituted “§

4.1-206.1

” for “§

4.1-207

” in the second sentence at the end; and in subsection C, substituted “subdivision A 13” for “subdivision A 14.”

§ 4.1-133.
Bailment system of warehousing; prohibited fees and charges.

In the event that the Board adopts any regulation or policy providing for bailment warehousing operations or otherwise requiring that a vendor of alcoholic beverages retain ownership or legal title to beverages purchased or ordered for purchase by the Board for any period after the Board or its agent comes into physical possession of such beverages, the Board shall not impose upon any vendor required to provide stock under such bailment system any:

Overstock fee or other charge based or premised in whole or in part upon the fact that a vendor has delivered to any warehouse, store or other facility owned or operated by the Board or its agent bailed stock in excess of any maximum inventory level established or suggested by the Board.

Space reservation fee or other charge based or premised in whole or in part upon the fact that a vendor has delivered to any warehouse, store or other facility owned or operated by the Board or its agent bailed stock in a quantity less than any minimum inventory level established or suggested by the Board.

Fee or charge for the movement of bailed stock within a bailment warehouse or other bailment facility, or from a bailment warehouse or other bailment facility to a work area in proximity to such warehouse or facility, not at the request of the vendor holding legal title to such stock for the purpose of inspecting such stock.

Fee or charge for conducting a physical inventory of bailed stock at the request of the vendor holding legal title to such stock, provided that no more than two such requests have been made within the current fiscal year with respect to the particular item or brand of stock that is the subject of the request.

Fee or charge for withdrawal of bailed stock by the vendor who retains legal title to such stock.

Fee or charge greater than fifteen dollars per hour for the placement of stock on pallets or other appurtenances designed to facilitate the movement of stock within the warehouse or other facility.

History.

1996, c. 692.